Illinois, session 104th, SB260.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Small 5Business Financing Transparency Act. 6    Section 2. Purpose and construction. The purpose of this 7Act is to protect business owners. This Act shall be liberally 8construed to effectuate its purpose. 9    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:10    "Applicant" means a person who has submitted an 11application for a registration under this Act. 12    "Closed-end financing" means a closed-end extension of 13credit, secured or unsecured, recourse or nonrecourse, 14including equipment financing that does not meet the 15definition of a lease under Section 2A-103 of the Uniform 16Commercial Code, that the recipient does not intend to use for 17personal, family, or household purposes. "Closed-end 18financing" includes financing with an established principal 19amount and duration.20    "Commercial financing database" means a reporting database 21certified by the Department as effective in receiving a report 22of commercial financing made under this Act.   SB0260- 2 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    "Commercial financing database provider" means an entity 2that provides a reporting database certified by the Department 3under this Act.4    "Commercial financing" means open-end financing, 5closed-end financing, sales-based financing, factoring 6transaction, or other form of financing, the proceeds of which 7the recipient does not intend to use primarily for personal, 8family, or household purposes. For purposes of determining 9whether a financing is a commercial financing, the provider 10may rely on any statement of intended purposes by the 11recipient. The statement may be a separate statement signed by 12the recipient; may be contained in the financing application, 13financing agreement, or other document signed or consented to 14by the recipient; or may be provided orally by the recipient so 15long as it is documented in the recipient's application file 16by the provider. Electronic signatures and consents are valid 17for purposes of the foregoing sentence. The provider shall not 18be required to ascertain that the proceeds of a commercial 19financing are used in accordance with the recipient's 20statement of intended purposes.21    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 22Professional Regulation.23    "Division of Financial Institutions" or "Division" means 24the Division of Financial Institutions of the Department of 25Financial and Professional Regulation. 26    "Factoring transaction" means an accounts receivable   SB0260- 3 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1purchase transaction that includes an agreement to purchase, 2transfer, or sell a legally enforceable claim for payment held 3by a recipient for goods the recipient has supplied or 4services the recipient has rendered that have been ordered but 5for which payment has not yet been made.6    "Finance charge" means the cost of financing as a dollar 7amount. "Finance charge" includes any charge payable directly 8or indirectly by the recipient and imposed directly or 9indirectly by the provider as an incident to or a condition of 10the extension of financing. "Finance charge" includes any 11charges as determined by the Secretary. For the purposes of an 12open-end financing, "finance charge" means the maximum amount 13of credit available to the recipient, in each case, that is 14drawn and held for the duration of the term or draw period. For 15the purposes of a factoring transaction, "finance charge" 16includes the discount taken on the face value of the accounts 17receivable. In addition, the finance charge shall include any 18charges determined by the Secretary.19    "Open-end financing" means an agreement for one or more 20extensions of open-end credit, secured or unsecured, that the 21recipient does not intend to use the proceeds of primarily for 22personal, family, or household purposes. "Open-end financing" 23includes credit extended by a provider under a plan in which: 24(i) the provider reasonably contemplates repeated 25transactions; (ii) the provider may impose a finance charge 26from time to time on an outstanding unpaid balance; and (iii)   SB0260- 4 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1the amount of credit that may be extended to the recipient 2during the term of the plan is generally made available to the 3extent that any outstanding balance is repaid.4    "Person" means an individual, entity, corporation, 5partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, 6association, joint stock company, trust, or unincorporated 7organization, including, but not limited to, a sole 8proprietorship. 9    "Provider" means a person who extends a specific offer of 10commercial financing to a recipient. "Provider", unless 11otherwise exempt, includes a person who solicits and presents 12specific offers of commercial financing on behalf of a third 13party. The mere extension of a specific offer or provision of 14disclosures for a commercial financing, is not sufficient to 15conclude that a provider is originating, making, funding, or 16providing commercial financing. "Provider" does not include:17        (1) a bank, trust company, or industrial loan company, 18    or any subsidiary or affiliate thereof, doing business 19    under the authority of, or in accordance with, a license, 20    certificate or charter issued by the United States, this 21    State, or any other state, district, territory, or 22    commonwealth of the United States that is authorized to 23    transact business in this State;24        (2) a federally chartered savings and loan 25    association, federal savings bank, or federal credit 26    union, or any subsidiary or affiliate thereof, that is   SB0260- 5 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    authorized to transact business in this State;2        (3) a savings and loan association, savings bank, or 3    credit union, or any subsidiary or affiliate thereof, 4    organized under the laws of this State or any other state 5    that is authorized to transact business in this State;6        (4) a lender regulated under the federal Farm Credit 7    Act; and8        (5) a person acting as a technology services provider 9    to an entity described by sub-paragraphs (1), (2), or (3) 10    for use as part of that entity's commercial financing 11    program, provided the person has no interest, or 12    arrangement, or agreement to purchase any interest in the 13    commercial financing extended by the entity in connection 14    with the program.15    "Recipient" means a person located in the State of 16Illinois who applies for commercial financing and is made a 17specific offer of commercial financing by a provider. For the 18purpose of determining whether a recipient is located in 19Illinois, a provider may rely upon (i) any written 20representation by the recipient as to whether it is located in 21Illinois; or (ii) the business address provided by the 22recipient in the application for commercial financing showing 23that the recipient is located in Illinois. "Recipient" 24includes an authorized representative of a person who applies 25for commercial financing and is made a specific offer of 26commercial financing by a provider. "Recipient" does not   SB0260- 6 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1include a person acting as a broker is not a recipient in a 2transaction they broker. 3    "Sales-based financing" means a transaction that is repaid 4by the recipient to the provider, over time, as a percentage of 5sales or revenue, in which the payment amount may increase or 6decrease according to the volume of sales made or revenue 7received by the recipient or a transaction that includes a 8true-up mechanism where the financing is repaid as a fixed 9payment but provides for a reconciliation process that adjusts 10the payment to an amount that is a percentage of sales or 11revenue.12    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 13Professional Regulation or a person authorized by the 14Secretary to perform the Secretary's responsibilities under 15this Act. 16    "Specific offer" means the specific terms of commercial 17financing, including price or amount, that is quoted to a 18recipient based on information obtained from or about the 19recipient that, if accepted by a recipient, shall be binding 20on the provider, as applicable, subject to any specific 21requirements stated in the specific terms.22    "True-up mechanism" means, with respect to sales-based 23financing, a contractual arrangement with all the following 24elements:25        (1) The financer receives periodic payments based upon 26    a pre-set amount stated in the contract.  SB0260- 7 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1        (2) The contract allows the recipient to request, or 2    the financer to initiate, adjustments to the payment 3    amount, credits to the recipient, or charges to the 4    recipient after execution of the contract, so that the 5    total amount paid by the recipient more closely reflects a 6    split rate listed in the contract. 7    Section 10. Applicability.8    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, this Act 9applies to any person that offers or provides commercial 10financing in Illinois or is otherwise a provider. 11    (b) The provisions of this Act apply to any person that 12seeks to evade its applicability by any device, subterfuge, or 13pretense whatsoever. 14    (c) The provisions of this Act apply to any person that 15aids or facilitates a violation of this Act.16    (d) The provisions of this Act do not apply to:17        (1) a bank, trust company, or industrial loan company 18    doing business under the authority of, or in accordance 19    with, a license, certificate or charter issued by the 20    United States, this State, or any other state, district, 21    territory, or commonwealth of the United States that is 22    authorized to transact business in this State;23        (2) a federally chartered savings and loan 24    association, federal savings bank, or federal credit union 25    that is authorized to transact business in this State;  SB0260- 8 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1        (3) a savings and loan association, savings bank, or 2    credit union organized under the laws of this State or any 3    other state that is authorized to transact business in 4    this State;5        (4) a lender regulated under the federal Farm Credit 6    Act; and7        (5) a person acting in the person's capacity as a 8    technology services provider to an entity described by 9    sub-paragraphs (1), (2), or (3) for use as part of that 10    entity's commercial financing program, provided the person 11    has no interest, or arrangement, or agreement to purchase 12    any interest in the commercial financing extended by the 13    entity in connection with the program.  14    Section 15. Division of Financial Institutions. This Act 15shall be administered by the Division on behalf of the 16Secretary. 17    Section 20. Registration requirement. 18    (a) It is unlawful for a person to engage in the conduct 19regulated by this Act unless the person: (i) registers with 20the Secretary in accordance with this Section; and (ii) 21maintains a valid registration. An officer or employee of a 22person required to register under this Section is not required 23to register if the person for whom the individual is an officer 24or employee is registered.  SB0260- 9 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    (b) Application for registration and renewal of 2registration shall be made in accordance with this Act and 3with the requirements of the multistate licensing system, if 4required by the Secretary. The application shall be in 5writing, under oath, and on a form obtained from and 6prescribed by the Secretary. The Secretary may change or 7update the form to carry out the purposes of this Act. The 8Secretary may require part or all of the application to be 9submitted electronically, with attestation, to the multistate 10licensing system.11    (c) Registrants shall apply to renew their registration 12every calendar year. Registrants may submit properly completed 13renewal application forms and filing fees 60 days before the 14registration expiration date, and the same shall be received 15by the Secretary at least 30 days before the registration 16expiration date. Absent a written extension from the 17Department, a registration shall expire on December 31 of each 18year if a registrant fails to timely submit a properly 19completed renewal application and fees.20    (d) Upon receipt of the registration, a registrant is 21authorized to engage in conduct regulated by this Act. The 22registration shall remain in full force and effect until it 23expires, is withdrawn by the registrant, or is revoked or 24suspended as provided in this Act.25    (e) To register under this Section, an applicant shall:26        (1) pay a registration fee of $2,500 to the   SB0260- 10 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    Department; and2        (2) submit a registration statement containing the 3    information described in subsection (g).4    (f) To renew a registration under this Section, a person 5shall:6        (1) pay the annual fee of $2,500 to the Department; 7    and8        (2) submit a renewal statement containing the 9    information described in subsection (g).10    (g) A registration or renewal statement must be submitted 11to the Secretary or to a multistate licensing system as 12approved by the Secretary. The registration or renewal 13statement shall include:14        (1) the name of the person;15        (2) the name in which the business will be transacted 16    if different from that required in paragraph (1), which 17    must be properly registered as an assumed corporate name 18    under the Business Corporation Act of 1983, an assumed 19    limited liability company name under the Limited Liability 20    Company Act, or an assumed business name under the Assumed 21    Business Name Act; 22        (3) the address of the person's principal business 23    office; 24        (4) the address of each office in this State at which 25    the person engages in commercial financing transactions; 26        (5) if the person engages in commercial financing   SB0260- 11 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    transactions in this State but does not maintain an office 2    in this State, a brief description of the manner in which 3    the business is conducted; 4        (6) if the person conducts business through an agent 5    located in this State, the name and address in this State 6    of the person's agent properly registered with the 7    Secretary of State; 8        (7) for a registration application, whether the 9    person, an officer, director, manager, operator, or 10    principal of the person, or an employee of the person 11    engaged in the business of commercial financing has been 12    convicted of a crime involving an act of fraud, 13    dishonesty, breach of trust, or money laundering; if the 14    applicant answers yes to this paragraph, then the 15    applicant shall report the names, titles or relationship 16    to the applicant or registrant, and the nature of the 17    covered crime;18        (8) for a renewal application, whether, in the past 19    year, the person, an officer, director, manager, operator, 20    or principal of the person, or an employee of the person 21    engaged in the business of commercial financing has been 22    convicted of a crime involving an act of fraud, 23    dishonesty, breach of trust, or money laundering; if the 24    registrant answers yes to this paragraph, then the 25    registrant shall report the names, titles or relationship 26    to the applicant or registrant, and the nature of the   SB0260- 12 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    covered crime;2        (9) a statement of the person's commitment to abide by 3    the requirements of registering persons under this Act, 4    including providing the required financing disclosures in 5    commercial financing offers as required under Sections 45, 6    50, 55, 60, 65, and 70 of this Act;7        (10) a copy of the commercial financing disclosure 8    form to be used for each type of commercial financing that 9    the person offers or intends to offer, and a description 10    of when the disclosure will be provided to the recipient;11        (11) information on financing offers presented by 12    registrant in Illinois in the previous calendar year, 13    including the number of financing offers made, the number 14    of financing offers made in which the disclosures as 15    required by Sections 45, 50, 55, 60, 65, and 70 were 16    offered, and the number of financing offers accepted by 17    recipients; and18        (12) any other information deemed necessary by the 19    Secretary.20    (h) The Secretary may refuse to accept or renew a 21registration if:22        (1) the Secretary determines that the person has not 23    complied with the provisions of this Act, its implementing 24    rules, or other laws that apply to the person; or25        (2) the Secretary determines that there is substantial 26    continuity between the person and any violator of this   SB0260- 13 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    Act, its implementing rules, or other laws that apply to 2    the person or related violator.3    (i) The Department shall adopt and amend such rules as may 4be required for the proper administration and enforcement of 5this Section, including rules providing for the form, content, 6and filing of a registration and renewal statement. 7    Section 25. Additional registration information. 8    (a) In order to fulfill the purposes of this Act, the 9Secretary may establish relationships or contracts with a 10multistate licensing system or other persons to collect and 11maintain records and process fees related to registrants or 12other persons subject to this Act. 13    (b) For the purposes of this Section, and to reduce the 14points of contact that the Secretary may have to maintain, the 15Secretary may use a multistate licensing system as a 16channeling agent for requesting and distributing information 17to and from any source. 18    (c) Each registrant shall furnish to the Secretary or 19multistate licensing system an updated business address within 2010 days after any change of business address. 21    Section 30. Registration expiration. No activity regulated 22by this Act shall be conducted by a registrant whose 23registration has expired. The Secretary may, within the 24Secretary's discretion, reinstate an expired registration upon   SB0260- 14 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1payment of the renewal fee, payment of a reactivation fee 2equal to 5 times the renewal fee, submission of a completed 3renewal application, and an affidavit of good cause for late 4renewal. 5    Section 35. Functions; powers; duties. The functions, 6powers, and duties of the Secretary include, but are not 7limited to, the following: 8        (1) to issue or refuse to issue any registration or 9    renewal; 10        (2) to revoke or suspend for cause any registration 11    issued under this Act; 12        (3) to keep records of all registrations issued under 13    this Act; 14        (4) to receive, consider, investigate, and act upon 15    complaints made by any person in connection with any 16    registration in this State or unregistered commercial 17    financing activity of any person; 18        (5) to adopt rules necessary and proper for the 19    administration of this Act, to protect consumers and 20    financing recipients, to promote fair competition, and as 21    otherwise authorized by this Act; 22        (6) to subpoena documents and witnesses and compel 23    their attendance and production, to administer oaths, and 24    to require the production of any books, papers, or other 25    materials relevant to any inquiry authorized by this Act   SB0260- 15 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    or its implementing rules; 2        (7) to issue orders against any person if the 3    Secretary has reasonable cause to believe that an unsafe, 4    unsound, or unlawful practice has occurred, is occurring, 5    or is about to occur; if any person is violating, or is 6    about to violate any law, rule, or written agreement with 7    the Secretary; or for the purpose of administering the 8    provisions of this Act and any rule adopted in accordance 9    with this Act; 10        (8) to address any inquiries to any registrant, or the 11    owners, officers, or directors thereof, in relation to its 12    activities and conditions, or any other matter connected 13    with its affairs, and any registrant or person so 14    addressed shall promptly reply in writing to those 15    inquiries. The Secretary may also require reports from any 16    registrant at any time the Secretary deems desirable; 17        (9) to enforce provisions of this Act and its 18    implementing rules;19        (10) to levy fees, including, but not limited to, 20    assessments, registration fees, civil penalties, and 21    charges for services performed in administering this Act. 22    The Secretary may establish and modify fees by rule. The 23    aggregate of all fees collected by the Secretary under 24    this Act shall be paid promptly after receipt into the 25    Financial Institution Fund. The amounts deposited into the 26    Financial Institution Fund shall be used for the ordinary   SB0260- 16 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    and contingent expenses of the Department. Nothing in this 2    Act prevents paying expenses including salaries, 3    retirement, social security, and State-paid insurance of 4    State employees, or any other expenses incurred under this 5    Act by appropriation from the General Revenue Fund or any 6    other fund; 7        (11) to issue refunds to registrants of any 8    overpayment for good cause shown; 9        (12) to appoint experts and special assistants as 10    needed to effectively and efficiently administer this Act; 11        (13) to conduct hearings for the purpose of 12    suspensions, denials, or revocations of registrations, 13    fining, or other discipline of registrants or unregistered 14    persons or entities;15        (14) to exercise visitorial power over a registrant: 16    (A) if the Secretary has reasonable cause to believe that 17    an unsafe, unsound, or unlawful practice has occurred, is 18    occurring, or is about to occur; or (B) if a person is 19    violating or is about to violate any law, rule, or written 20    agreement with the Secretary; and21        (15) to enter into cooperative agreements with state 22    regulatory authorities of other states to provide for 23    examination of corporate offices or branches of those 24    states, participate in joint examinations with other 25    regulators, and to accept reports of the examinations: (A) 26    if the Secretary has reasonable cause to believe that an   SB0260- 17 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    unsafe, unsound, or unlawful practice has occurred, is 2    occurring, or is about to occur; or (B) if a person is 3    violating or is about to violate any law, rule, or written 4    agreement with the Secretary;5        (16) to impose civil penalties of up to $200 per day 6    against a registrant for failing to respond to a 7    regulatory request or reporting requirement; and 8        (17) to enter into agreements in connection with a 9    multistate licensing system. 10    Section 40. Subpoena power of the Secretary. 11    (a) The Secretary may issue and serve subpoenas and 12subpoenas duces tecum to compel the attendance of witnesses 13and the production of all books, accounts, records, and other 14documents and materials relevant to an investigation. The 15Secretary, or the Secretary's duly authorized representative, 16may administer oaths and affirmations to any person. 17    (b) If a person does not comply with the Secretary's 18subpoena or subpoena duces tecum, the Secretary may, through 19the Attorney General, petition the circuit court of the county 20in which the subpoenaed person resides or has its principal 21place of business for an order requiring the subpoenaed person 22to testify and to comply with the subpoena duces tecum. The 23court may grant injunctive relief restraining the person from 24engaging in activity regulated by this Act. The court may 25grant other relief, including, but not limited to, the   SB0260- 18 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1restraint, by injunction or appointment of a receiver, of any 2transfer, pledge, assignment, or other disposition of the 3person's assets, concealment, destruction, or other 4disposition of books, accounts, records, or other documents 5and materials, as the court deems appropriate, until the 6person has fully complied with the subpoena or subpoena duces 7tecum and the Secretary has completed an investigation. 8    (c) If it appears to the Secretary that the compliance 9with a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum issued or caused to be 10issued by the Secretary under this Section is essential to an 11investigation, the Secretary, in addition to the other 12remedies provided for in this Act, may, through the Attorney 13General, apply for relief to the circuit court of the county in 14which the subpoenaed person resides or has its principal place 15of business. The court shall thereupon direct the issuance of 16an order against the subpoenaed person requiring sufficient 17bond conditioned on compliance with the subpoena or subpoena 18duces tecum. The court shall cause to be endorsed on the order 19a suitable amount of bond or payment pursuant to which the 20person named be freed, having a due regard to the nature of the 21case.22    (d) In addition, the Secretary may, through the Attorney 23General, seek a writ of attachment or an equivalent order from 24the circuit court having jurisdiction over the person who has 25refused to obey a subpoena, who has refused to give testimony, 26or who has refused to produce the matters described in the   SB0260- 19 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1subpoena duces tecum. 2    Section 45. Sales-based financing disclosure requirements. 3A provider subject to this Act shall provide the following 4disclosures to a recipient, in a manner prescribed by the 5Secretary, if any, at the time of extending a specific offer of 6sales-based financing:7        (1) The total amount of the commercial financing, and, 8    if different from the financing amount, the disbursement 9    amount after any amount deducted or withheld at 10    disbursement.11        (2) The finance charge.12        (3) The estimated annual percentage rate, using the 13    words annual percentage rate or the abbreviation 14    "Estimated APR", expressed as a yearly rate, inclusive of 15    any fees and finance charges, based on the estimated term 16    of repayment and the projected periodic payment amounts. 17    The estimated term of repayment and the projected periodic 18    payment amounts shall be calculated based on the 19    projection of the recipient's sales, which may be referred 20    to as the projected sales volume. The projected sales 21    volume may be calculated using the historical method or 22    the underwriting method. The provider shall provide notice 23    to the Secretary on which method the provider intends to 24    use across all instances of sales-based financing offered 25    in calculating the estimated annual percentage rate under   SB0260- 20 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    this Section, according to the following:2            (A) A provider using the historical method shall 3        use an average historical volume of sales or revenue 4        by which the financing's payment amounts are based and 5        the estimated annual percentage rate is calculated. 6        The provider shall fix the historical time period used 7        to calculate the average historical volume and use the 8        period for all disclosure purposes for all sales-based 9        financing products offered. The fixed historical time 10        period shall either be the preceding time period from 11        the specific offer or, alternatively, the provider may 12        use average sales for the same number of months with 13        the highest sales volume within the previous 12 14        months. The fixed historical time period shall be no 15        less than one month and shall not exceed 12 months.16            (B) A provider using the underwriting method shall 17        determine the estimated annual percentage rate, the 18        estimated term, and the projected payments, using a 19        projected sales volume that the provider elects for 20        each disclosure, if they participate in a review 21        process prescribed by the Secretary. A provider shall, 22        on an annual basis, report data to the Secretary of 23        estimated annual percentage rates disclosed to the 24        recipient and actual retrospective annual percentage 25        rates of completed transactions. The report shall 26        contain the information as the Department may adopt by   SB0260- 21 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1        rule as necessary or appropriate for the purpose of 2        making a determination of whether the deviation 3        between the estimated annual percentage rate and 4        actual retrospective annual percentage rates of 5        completed transactions was reasonable. The Secretary 6        shall establish the method of reporting and may, upon 7        a finding that the use of projected sales volume by the 8        provider has resulted in an unacceptable deviation 9        between estimated and actual annual percentage rate, 10        require the provider to use the historical method. The 11        Secretary may consider unusual and extraordinary 12        circumstances impacting the provider's deviation 13        between estimated and actual annual percentage rate in 14        the determination of the finding.15        (4) The total repayment amount, which is the 16    disbursement amount plus the finance charge.17        (5) The estimated term, which is the period of time 18    required for the periodic payments, based on the projected 19    sales volume, to equal the total amount required to be 20    repaid.21        (6) The payment amounts, based on the projected sales 22    volume:23            (A) for payment amounts that are fixed, the 24        payment amounts and frequency, such as, daily, weekly, 25        monthly, and, if the payment frequency is other than 26        monthly, the amount of the average projected payments   SB0260- 22 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1        per month; or2            (B) for payment amounts that are variable, a 3        payment schedule or a description of the method used 4        to calculate the amounts and frequency of payments and 5        the amount of the average projected payments per 6        month.7        (7) A description of all other potential fees and 8    charges not included in the finance charge, including, but 9    not limited to, draw fees, late payment fees, and returned 10    payment fees.11        (8) If the recipient elects to pay off or refinance 12    the commercial financing before full repayment, the 13    provider shall disclose:14            (A) whether the recipient would be required to pay 15        any finance charges other than interest accrued since 16        their last payment; if so, disclosure of the 17        percentage of any unpaid portion of the finance charge 18        and maximum dollar amount the recipient could be 19        required to pay; and20            (B) whether the recipient would be required to pay 21        any additional fees not already included in the 22        finance charge.23        (9) A description of collateral requirements or 24    security interests, if any. 25    Section 50. Commercial closed-end financing disclosure   SB0260- 23 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1requirements. 2    (a) A provider subject to this Act shall provide the 3following disclosures to a recipient, in a manner prescribed 4by the Secretary, if any, at the time of extending a specific 5offer for closed-end financing:6        (1) The total amount of the commercial financing, and, 7    if different from the financing amount, the disbursement 8    amount after any amount deducted or withheld at 9    disbursement.10        (2) The finance charge.11        (3) The annual percentage rate, using only the words 12    annual percentage rate or the abbreviation "APR", 13    expressed as a yearly rate, inclusive of any fees and 14    finance charges that cannot be avoided by a recipient.15        (4) The total repayment amount, which is the 16    disbursement amount plus the finance charge.17        (5) The term of the financing.18        (6) The payment amounts:19            (A) for payment amounts that are fixed, the 20        payment amounts and frequency, such as daily, weekly, 21        monthly, and, if the term is longer than one month, the 22        average monthly payment amount; or23            (B) for payment amounts that are variable, a full 24        payment schedule or a description of the method used 25        to calculate the amounts and frequency of payments, 26        and, if the term is longer than one month, the   SB0260- 24 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1        estimated average monthly payment amount.2        (7) A description of all other potential fees and 3    charges that can be avoided by the recipient, including, 4    but not limited to, late payment fees and returned payment 5    fees. 6        (8) If the recipient elects to pay off or refinance 7    the commercial financing before full repayment, the 8    provider shall disclose:9            (A) whether the recipient would be required to pay 10        any finance charges other than interest accrued since 11        their last payment; if so, disclosure of the 12        percentage of any unpaid portion of the finance charge 13        and maximum dollar amount the recipient could be 14        required to pay; and15            (B) whether the recipient would be required to pay 16        any additional fees not already included in the 17        finance charge.18        (9) A description of collateral requirements or 19    security interests, if any.20    (b) If an advance requires repayment in periodic 21installments over time and does not qualify as sales-based 22financing, then the advance qualifies as close-end financing 23and shall satisfy the disclosure requirements of this Section. 24    Section 55. Open-end commercial financing disclosure 25requirements. A provider subject to this Act shall provide the   SB0260- 25 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1following disclosures to a recipient, in a manner prescribed 2by the Secretary, if any, at the time of extending a specific 3offer for open-end financing:4        (1) The maximum amount of credit available to the 5    recipient, such as the credit line amount, and the amount 6    scheduled to be drawn by the recipient at the time the 7    offer is extended, if any, less any amount deducted or 8    withheld at disbursement.9        (2) The finance charge.10        (3) The annual percentage rate, using only the words 11    annual percentage rate or the abbreviation "APR", 12    expressed as a nominal yearly rate, inclusive of any fees 13    and finance charges that cannot be avoided by a recipient, 14    and based on the maximum amount of credit available to the 15    recipient and the term resulting from making the minimum 16    required payments term as disclosed. 17        (4) The total repayment amount, which is the draw 18    amount, less any fees deducted or withheld at 19    disbursement, plus the finance charge. The total repayment 20    amount shall assume a draw amount equal to the maximum 21    amount of credit available to the recipient if drawn and 22    held for the duration of the term or draw period.23        (5) The term of the plan, if applicable, or the period 24    over which a draw is amortized.25        (6) The payment frequency and amounts, based on the 26    assumptions used in the calculation of the annual   SB0260- 26 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    percentage rate, including a description of payment amount 2    requirements such as a minimum payment amount, and if the 3    payment frequency is other than monthly, the amount of the 4    average projected payments per month. For payment amounts 5    that are variable, the provider should include a payment 6    schedule or a description of the method used to calculate 7    the amounts and frequency of payments and the estimated 8    average monthly payment amount.9        (7) A description of all other potential fees and 10    charges that can be avoided by the recipient, including, 11    but not limited to, draw fees, late payment fees, and 12    returned payment fees.13        (8) Were the recipient to elect to pay off or 14    refinance the commercial financing before full repayment, 15    the provider shall disclose:16            (A) whether the recipient would be required to pay 17        any finance charges other than interest accrued since 18        their last payment; if so, disclosure of the 19        percentage of any unpaid portion of the finance charge 20        and maximum dollar amount the recipient could be 21        required to pay; and22            (B) whether the recipient would be required to pay 23        any additional fees not already included in the 24        finance charge.25        (9) A description of collateral requirements or 26    security interests, if any.   SB0260- 27 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    Section 60. Factoring transaction disclosure requirements. 2A provider subject to this Act shall provide the following 3disclosures to a recipient, in a manner prescribed by the 4Secretary, if any, at the time of extending a specific offer 5for a factoring transaction:6        (1) The amount of the receivables purchase price paid 7    to the recipient, and, if different from the purchase 8    price, the disbursement amount after any amount deducted 9    or withheld at disbursement.10        (2) The finance charge.11        (3) The estimated annual percentage rate, using that 12    term. To calculate the estimated annual percentage rate, 13    the purchase amount is considered the financing amount, 14    the purchase amount minus the finance charge is considered 15    the payment amount, and the term is established by the 16    payment due date of the receivables. As an alternate 17    method of establishing the term, the provider may estimate 18    the term for a factoring transaction as the average 19    payment period based on its historical data over a period 20    not to exceed the previous 12 months, concerning payment 21    invoices paid by the party or parties owing the accounts 22    receivable in question.23        (4) The total payment amount, which is the purchase 24    amount plus the finance charge.25        (5) A description of all other potential fees and   SB0260- 28 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    charges that can be avoided by the recipient.2        (6) A description of the receivables purchased and any 3    additional collateral requirements or security interests. 4    Section 65. Other forms of financing disclosure 5requirements. The Secretary may require disclosure by a 6provider extending a specific offer of commercial financing 7which is not an open-end financing, closed-end financing, 8sales-based financing, or factoring transaction but otherwise 9meets the definition of commercial financing. Subject to rules 10adopted by the Secretary, a provider subject to this Act shall 11provide the following disclosures to a recipient, in a manner 12prescribed by the Secretary, if any, at the time of extending a 13specific offer of other forms of financing:14        (1) The total amount of the commercial financing, and, 15    if different from the financing amount, the disbursement 16    amount after any fees deducted or withheld at 17    disbursement.18        (2) The finance charge.19        (3) The annual percentage rate, using only the words 20    annual percentage rate or the abbreviation "APR", 21    expressed as a yearly rate, inclusive of any fees and 22    finance charges.23        (4) The total repayment amount which is the 24    disbursement amount plus the finance charge.25        (5) The term of the financing.  SB0260- 29 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1        (6) The payment amounts:2            (A) for payment amounts that are fixed, the 3        payment amounts and frequency, such as daily, weekly, 4        monthly, and the average monthly payment amount; or5            (B) for payment amounts that are variable, a 6        payment schedule or a description of the method used 7        to calculate the amounts and frequency of payments, 8        and the estimated average monthly payment amount.9        (7) A description of all other potential fees and 10    charges that can be avoided by the recipient, including, 11    but not limited to, late payment fees and returned payment 12    fees.13        (8) If the recipient elects to pay off or refinance 14    the commercial financing before full repayment, the 15    provider shall disclose:16            (A) whether the recipient would be required to pay 17        any finance charges other than interest accrued since 18        their last payment; if so, disclosure of the 19        percentage of any unpaid portion of the finance charge 20        and maximum dollar amount the recipient could be 21        required to pay; and22            (B) whether the recipient would be required to pay 23        any additional fees not already included in the 24        finance charge.25        (9) A description of collateral requirements or 26    security interests, if any.   SB0260- 30 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    Section 70. Disclosure requirements for renewal financing. 2If, as a condition of obtaining the commercial financing, the 3provider requires the recipient to pay off the balance of an 4existing commercial financing from the same provider, the 5provider shall disclose:6        (1) The amount of the new commercial financing that is 7    used to pay off the portion of the existing commercial 8    financing that consists of prepayment charges required to 9    be paid and any unpaid interest expense that was not 10    forgiven at the time of renewal. For financing for which 11    the total repayment amount is calculated as a fixed 12    amount, the prepayment charge is equal to the original 13    finance charge multiplied by the amount of the renewal 14    used to pay off existing financing as a percentage of the 15    total repayment amount, minus any portion of the total 16    repayment amount forgiven by the provider at the time of 17    prepayment. If the amount is more than zero, the amount 18    shall be the answer to the following question: "Does the 19    renewal financing include any amount that is used to pay 20    unpaid finance charges or fees, also known as double 21    dipping? Yes, {enter amount}. If the amount is zero, the 22    answer would be no."23        (2) If the disbursement amount will be reduced to pay 24    down any unpaid portion of the outstanding balance, the 25    actual dollar amount by which the disbursement amount will   SB0260- 31 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    be reduced. 2    Section 75. Additional information. Nothing in this Act 3shall prevent a provider from providing or disclosing 4additional information on a commercial financing being offered 5to a recipient, provided however, that the additional 6information shall not be disclosed as part of the disclosure 7required by this Act. If other metrics of financing cost are 8disclosed or used in the application process of a commercial 9financing, these metrics shall not be presented as a "rate" if 10they are not the annual interest rate or the annual percentage 11rate. The term "interest", when used to describe a percentage 12rate, shall only be used to describe annualized percentage 13rates, such as the annual interest rate. When a provider 14states a rate of finance charge or a financing amount to a 15recipient during an application process for commercial 16financing, the provider shall also state the rate as an 17"annual percentage rate", using that term or the abbreviation 18"APR". 19    Section 80. Commercial financing disclosure forms approved 20for use in the other states. The Secretary may approve the use 21of commercial financing disclosure forms approved for use in 22other states with commercial financing disclosure requirements 23that are substantially similar to or exceed the requirements 24set forth in this Act, including the disclosure requirements   SB0260- 32 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1in Sections 45, 50, 55, 60, 65, and 70 of this Act. 2    Section 85. Violation of disclosure requirements. If the 3Secretary finds that a provider who is required to register 4with the Department according to this Act has violated any 5disclosure requirements outlined in Sections 45, 50, 55, 60, 665, 70, and 75, that shall be considered a violation of this 7Act separate from any other violation that may result from 8operating without a registration as outlined in Section 95. 9    Section 90. Notification. 10    (a) A registrant must advise the Secretary in writing of 11any changes to the information submitted on its most recent 12registration or renewal of registration within 30 days after 13the change.14    (b) A registrant must advise the Secretary in writing that 15the registrant has been disciplined, including denial of 16licensure, by a licensing authority of this State or another 17state within 10 days after entry of the discipline. 18    Section 95. Disciplinary actions.19    (a) The Secretary may enter an order imposing one or more 20of the following penalties: 21        (1) revocation of registration; 22        (2) suspension of a registration subject to 23    reinstatement upon satisfying all reasonable conditions   SB0260- 33 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    the Secretary may specify; 2        (3) placement of the registrant or applicant on 3    probation for a period of time and subject to all 4    reasonable conditions as the Secretary may specify; 5        (4) imposition of civil monetary penalties not to 6    exceed $10,000 for each separate offense, but civil 7    penalties may not to exceed $50,000 for all violations 8    arising from the use of the same single transaction, 9    including for financing offers that are not consummated;10        (5) restitution, refunds, or any other relief 11    necessary to protect recipients; and 12        (6) denial of a registration. 13    (b) Grounds for penalties include:14        (1) if a registrant has violated or aided another to 15    violate any provision of this Act, any rule adopted by the 16    Secretary, or any other law, rule, or regulation of this 17    State, any other state, or the United States;18        (2) if a person has violated or aided another to 19    violate any provision of this Act or any rule adopted by 20    the Secretary pursuant to this Act;21        (3) if a fact or condition exists that, if it had 22    existed at the time of the original application for 23    registration, would have warranted the Secretary in 24    refusing issue the original registration;25        (4) that a registrant that is not an individual has 26    acted or failed to act in a way that would be cause for   SB0260- 34 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    suspending or revoking a registration to an individual; 2        (5) that a person engaged in unsafe, unsound, unfair, 3    deceptive, or abusive business practices related to the 4    activity covered by this Act; 5        (6) that a registrant or an officer, director, 6    manager, operator, or principal of the registrant, or an 7    employee of the registrant engaged in the business of 8    commercial financing has been adjudicated guilty of a 9    crime against the law of this State, any other state, or of 10    the United States involving moral turpitude, abusive, 11    deceptive, fraudulent, or dishonest dealing; 12        (7) that a final judgment has been entered against 13    registrant or an officer, director, manager, operator, or 14    principal of the registrant, or an employee of the 15    registrant engaged in the business of commercial financing 16    in a civil action upon grounds of abusive conduct, 17    conversion, fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit;18        (8) that an applicant made a material misstatement in 19    the applicant's application for registration or any other 20    communication to the Secretary; 21        (9) that a person has demonstrated, by course of 22    conduct, negligence or incompetence in performing any act 23    for which it is required to hold a registration under this 24    Act; 25        (10) that a person has failed to advise the Secretary 26    in writing of any changes to the information submitted on   SB0260- 35 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    the person's most recent registration or renewal of 2    registration within 30 days after the change; 3        (11) that a registrant had a license, registration, or 4    the equivalent, to practice any profession, occupation, 5    other industry or activity requiring licensure revoked, 6    suspended, disciplined, or otherwise acted against, 7    including the denial of licensure by a licensing authority 8    of this State or another state, territory, or country for 9    fraud, dishonest dealing, misrepresentations, 10    incompetence, conversion, any act of moral turpitude or 11    any other grounds that would constitute grounds for 12    discipline under this Act; 13        (12) that a person registered under this Act failed to 14    timely notify the Secretary that the person has been 15    disciplined, including denial of licensure, by a licensing 16    authority of this State or another state as required under 17    subsection (b) of Section 90;18        (13) that a person engaged in activities regulated by 19    this Act without a current, active registration unless 20    specifically exempted by this Act; 21        (14) that a person failed to timely pay any fee, 22    charge, or civil penalty assessed under this Act; and23        (15) that a person refused, obstructed, evaded, or 24    unreasonably delayed an investigation or information 25    request authorized under this Act, or refused, obstructed, 26    evaded, or unreasonably delayed compliance with the   SB0260- 36 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    Secretary's subpoena or subpoena duces tecum. 2    (c) No registration shall be suspended or revoked, except 3as provided in this Section, nor shall any person be assessed a 4civil penalty without notice of his or her right to a hearing. 5    (d) The Secretary may suspend any registration for a 6period not exceeding 180 days pending investigation for good 7cause shown that an emergency exists. 8    (e) No revocation, suspension, or surrender of any 9registration shall impair or affect the obligation of any 10preexisting lawful contract between the registrant and any 11person. The Secretary's approval of a registrant's application 12to surrender its registration shall not affect the 13registrant's civil or criminal liability for acts committed 14prior to surrender. Surrender of a registration does not 15entitle the registrant to a return of any part of the 16registration fee.17    (f) Every registration issued under this Act shall remain 18in force and effect until the registration expires, is 19surrendered, is revoked, or is suspended in accordance with 20the provisions of this Act. The Secretary shall have authority 21to reinstate a suspended registration or to issue a new 22registration to a registrant whose registration has been 23revoked or surrendered if no fact or condition then exists 24which would have warranted the Secretary in refusing 25originally to issue that registration under this Act. 26    (g) Whenever the Secretary imposes discipline authorized   SB0260- 37 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1by this Section, the Secretary shall execute a written order 2to that effect. The Secretary shall serve a copy of the order 3upon the person. The Secretary shall serve the person with 4notice of the order, including a statement of the reasons for 5the order personally or by certified mail. Service by 6certified mail shall be deemed completed when the notice is 7deposited in the U.S. Mail. 8    (h) An order assessing a civil penalty, an order revoking 9or suspending a registration, or an order denying renewal of a 10registration shall take effect upon service of the order 11unless the registrant serves the Department with a written 12request for a hearing in the manner required by the order 13within 10 days after the date of service of the order. If a 14person requests a hearing, the order shall be stayed from its 15date of service until the Department enters a final 16administrative order. Hearings shall be conducted as follows:17        (1) If the registrant requests a hearing, then the 18    Secretary shall schedule a hearing within 90 days after 19    the request for a hearing unless otherwise agreed to by 20    the parties. 21        (2) The hearing shall be held at the time and place 22    designated by the Secretary. The Secretary and any 23    administrative law judge designated by the Secretary shall 24    have the power to administer oaths and affirmations, 25    subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, take 26    evidence, and require the production of books, papers,   SB0260- 38 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    correspondence, and other records or information that they 2    consider relevant or material to the inquiry. 3    (i) The costs of administrative hearings conducted under 4this Section shall be paid by the registrant or other person 5subject to the hearing. 6    (j) Registrants and other persons subject to this Act 7shall be subject to the disciplinary actions specified in this 8Act for any violations conducted by any officer, director, 9shareholder, joint venture, partner, owner, including, but not 10limited to, ultimate equitable owner. 11    Section 100. Investigation of complaints. The Secretary 12may investigate any complaints and inquiries made concerning 13this Act and any registrants or persons the Secretary believes 14may be required to register under this Act. Each registrant or 15person the Secretary believes may be required to register 16under this Act shall open the registrant's or person's books, 17records, documents, and offices wherever situated to the 18Secretary as needed to facilitate the investigations. 19    Section 105. Additional investigation authority. In 20addition to any authority allowed under this Act, the 21Secretary may conduct investigations as follows:22        (1) For purposes of initial registration, registration 23    renewal, registration suspension, registration 24    conditioning, registration probation, registration   SB0260- 39 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    revocation or termination, or general or specific inquiry 2    or investigation to determine compliance with this Act, 3    the Secretary may access, receive, and use any books, 4    accounts, records, files, documents, information, or 5    evidence, including, but not limited to, the following: 6            (A) criminal, civil, registration, and 7        administrative history information, including 8        nonconviction data as specified in the Criminal Code 9        of 2012; (B) personal history and experience 10        information, including independent credit reports 11        obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in 12        Section 603(p) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting 13        Act; and (C) any other documents, information, or 14        evidence the Secretary deems relevant to the inquiry 15        or investigation, regardless of the location, 16        possession, control, or custody of the documents, 17        information, or evidence. 18        (2) For the purposes of investigating violations or 19    complaints arising under this Act, the Secretary may 20    review or investigate any registrant or person subject to 21    this Act as necessary in order to carry out the purposes of 22    this Act. The Secretary may direct, subpoena, or order the 23    attendance of, and examine under oath all persons and 24    order any person to produce records, files, and any other 25    documents the Secretary deems relevant to an inquiry. 26        (3) Each person subject to this Act shall make   SB0260- 40 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    available to the Secretary upon request the books and 2    records relating to the operations of the person subject 3    to this Act. The Secretary shall have access to those 4    books and records and may interview the owners, officers, 5    principals, employees, independent contractors, agents, 6    vendors, and customers of any registrant or person subject 7    to this Act. 8        (4) In making any investigation authorized by this 9    Act, the Secretary may control access to any documents and 10    records of the registrant or person under investigation. 11    The Secretary may take possession of the documents and 12    records or otherwise take constructive control of the 13    documents. During the period of control, no person shall 14    remove or alter any of the documents or records, except 15    pursuant to a court order or with the consent of the 16    Secretary. Unless the Secretary has reasonable grounds to 17    believe the documents or records of the registrant have 18    been or are at risk of being altered or destroyed for 19    purposes of concealing a violation of this Act, the 20    registrant or owner of the documents and records shall 21    have access to the documents or records as necessary to 22    conduct its ordinary business affairs. 23        (5) In order to carry out the purposes of this 24    Section, the Secretary may: 25            (A) retain attorneys, accountants, or other 26        professionals and specialists as auditors or   SB0260- 41 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1        investigators to conduct or assist in the conduct of 2        investigations;3            (B) enter into agreements or relationships with 4        other government officials or regulatory associations 5        to protect consumers or financing recipients, improve 6        efficiencies, and reduce regulatory burden by sharing 7        resources, standardized or uniform methods or 8        procedures, and documents, records, information, or 9        evidence obtained under this Section; 10            (C) use, hire, contract, or employ publicly or 11        privately available analytical systems, methods, or 12        software or investigate the registrant or person 13        subject to this Act; 14            (D) accept and rely on examination or 15        investigation reports made by other government 16        officials, within or outside this State; or 17            (E) accept audit reports made by an independent 18        certified public accountant for the person subject to 19        this Act and may incorporate the audit report in the 20        report of the investigation or other writing of the 21        Secretary. 22        (6) The authority of this Section shall remain in 23    effect, whether the person subject to this Act acts or 24    claims to act under any licensing or registration law of 25    this State or claims to act without the authority. 26        (7) No registrant or person subject to investigation   SB0260- 42 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    or under this Section may knowingly withhold, alter, 2    abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, hide, or conceal any 3    books, records, computer records, or other information or 4    take actions designed to delay or complicate review of 5    records. 6    Section 110. Confidentiality. To promote more effective 7regulation, protect consumers and financing recipients, and 8reduce regulatory burden through inter-regulatory sharing of 9confidential supervisory information: 10        (1) The privacy or confidentiality of any information 11    or material provided to a multistate licensing system, 12    including all privileges arising under federal or state 13    court rules and law, shall continue to apply to the 14    information or material after the information or material 15    has been disclosed to the multistate licensing system. 16    Information and material may be shared with a multistate 17    licensing system, federal and state regulatory officials 18    with relevant oversight authority, and law enforcement 19    without the loss of privilege or the loss of 20    confidentiality protections. 21        (2) The Secretary is authorized to enter into 22    agreements or sharing arrangements with other governmental 23    agencies, the Conference of State Bank Supervisors, and 24    other associations representing governmental agencies. 25        (3) Information or material that is privileged or   SB0260- 43 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    confidential under this Act as determined by the Secretary 2    is not subject to the following: 3            (A) disclosure under any State law governing the 4        disclosure to the public of information held by an 5        officer or an agency of the State; or 6            (B) subpoena, discovery, or admission into 7        evidence, in any private civil action or 8        administrative process except as authorized by the 9        Secretary. 10        (4) Any other law relating to the disclosure of 11    confidential supervisory information that is inconsistent 12    with this Act shall be superseded by the requirements of 13    this Section to the extent the other law provides less 14    confidentiality or a weaker privilege for information that 15    is privileged or confidential under this Act. 16        (5) Confidential or privileged information received 17    from a multistate licensing system, another licensing 18    body, federal and state regulatory officials, or law 19    enforcement shall be protected to the same extent as the 20    Secretary's confidential and privileged information is 21    protected under this Act. The Secretary may also protect 22    from disclosure confidential or privileged information 23    that would be exempt from disclosure to the extent it is 24    held directly by the multistate licensing system, another 25    licensing body, federal and state regulatory officials, or 26    law enforcement.   SB0260- 44 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    Section 115. Appeal and review. 2    (a) The Secretary may, in accordance with the Illinois 3Administrative Procedure Act, adopt rules to provide for 4review within the Department of their decisions affecting the 5rights of persons under this Act. The review shall provide 6for, at a minimum: 7        (1) appointment of a hearing officer; 8        (2) appropriate procedural rules, specific deadlines 9    for filings, and standards of evidence and of proof; and 10        (3) provisions for apportioning costs among parties to 11    the appeal. 12    (b) All final agency determinations of appeals to 13decisions of the Secretary may be reviewed in accordance with 14and under the provisions of the Administrative Review Law. 15Appeals from all final orders and judgments entered by a court 16in review of any final administrative decision of the 17Secretary or of any final agency review of a decision of the 18Secretary may be taken as in other civil cases. 19    Section 120. Registration fees. 20    (a) The fee for initial registration is $2,500. The fee is 21nonrefundable. 22    (b) The fee for annual application renewal is $2,500. The 23fee is nonrefundable. 24    (c) The Department shall impose a contingent fee   SB0260- 45 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1sufficient to cover its operating expenses in administering 2this Act not otherwise covered by all other revenue collected 3under this Act. Each registrant shall pay to the Division its 4pro rata share, based on number or volume of transactions or 5revenue, of the cost for administration of this Act that 6exceeds other fees listed in this Section, as estimated by the 7Division, for the current year and any deficit actually 8incurred in the administration of this Act in prior years. 9    Section 125. Cease and desist order. 10    (a) The Secretary may issue a cease and desist order to any 11registrant or person doing business without the required 12registration when, in the opinion of the Secretary, the 13registrant or other person has violated, is violating, or is 14about to violate any provision of this Act or any rule adopted 15by the Department under this Act or any requirement imposed in 16writing by the Department as a condition of granting any 17authorization permitted by this Act. The cease and desist 18order authorized by this Section may be issued prior to a 19hearing.20    (b) The Secretary shall serve notice of the cease and 21desist order, either personally or by certified mail. Service 22by certified mail shall be deemed completed when the notice is 23deposited in the U.S. Mail. The Secretary's notice shall 24include a statement of the reasons for the action. 25    (c) Within 10 days after service of the cease and desist   SB0260- 46 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1order, the person subject to the cease and desist order may 2request a hearing in writing. The Secretary shall schedule a 3preliminary hearing within 60 days after the request for a 4hearing unless the parties agree to a later date. 5    (d) If it is determined that the Secretary had the 6authority to issue the cease and desist order, the Secretary 7may issue the orders as may be reasonably necessary to 8correct, eliminate, deter, or remedy the conduct described in 9the order and resulting harms. 10    (e) The powers vested in the Secretary by this Section are 11additional to all other powers and remedies vested in the 12Secretary by any law. Nothing in this Section shall be 13construed as requiring that the Secretary shall employ the 14power conferred in this Section instead of or as a condition 15precedent to the exercise of any other power or remedy vested 16in the Secretary. 17    Section 130. Injunctions. The Secretary may maintain an 18action in the name of the people of this State and may apply 19for an injunction in the circuit court to enjoin a person from 20violating this Act or its implementing rules through the 21Attorney General. 22    Section 135. Exemptions. This Act does not apply to, and 23does not place any additional requirements or obligations 24upon, any of the following:   SB0260- 47 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1        (1) any person or entity that is not a provider;2        (2) a commercial financing transaction secured by real 3    property;4        (3) a lease as defined in Section 2-A-103 of the 5    Uniform Commercial Code, not including finance leases as 6    defined in paragraph (g) of subsection (1) of Section 7    2A-103 of the Uniform Commercial Code; or8        (4) a company primarily in the business of 9    manufacturing equipment, or any subsidiary or affiliate of 10    such a company, when offering a commercial financing 11    transaction for which the majority of the proceeds are 12    used to finance nonfinancial products manufactured by the 13    company, or any subsidiary or affiliate of such a company, 14    or the maintenance of or other services on such products; 15        (5) any person or provider who makes no more than 5 16    commercial financing transactions in this State in a 17    12-month period;18        (6) a single, discrete commercial financing 19    transaction in an amount over $500,000; or20        (7) a commercial financing transaction in which the 21    recipient is a vehicle dealer subject to Section 5-101 or 22    5-102 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, an affiliate of a 23    dealer, a rental vehicle company as defined in Section 10 24    of the Renter's Financial Responsibility and Protection 25    Act, or an affiliate of a company under a commercial 26    financing agreement or commercial open-end credit plan of   SB0260- 48 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    at least $50,000, including any commercial loan made under 2    a commercial financing transaction. 3    Section 140. Complaint disclosure. All commercial 4financing shall include a clear and conspicuous notice on how 5to file a complaint with the Department. 6    Section 145. Rules. The Secretary may adopt rules to enact 7and enforce this Act, including, but not limited to: 8        (1) rules defining the terms used in this Act and as 9    may be necessary and appropriate to interpret and 10    implement the provisions of this Act;11        (2) rules for the enforcement and administration of 12    this Act; 13        (3) rules for the protection of consumers and 14    recipients in this State; 15        (4) rules defining improper or fraudulent business 16    practices in connection with commercial financing; and17        (5) rules to implement Section 165. 18    Section 150. Violations. 19    (a) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to restrict the 20exercise of powers or the performance of the duties that the 21Attorney General is authorized to exercise or perform by law. 22    (b) Any violation of this Act constitutes an unlawful 23practice in violation of the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive   SB0260- 49 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1Business Practices Act. The Attorney General may enforce a 2violation of this Act as an unlawful practice under the 3Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. 4    Section 152. Limitation on liability. No provision of this 5Act imposes any liability on a provider as a result of the 6actual annual percentage rate charged by a provider differing 7from the estimated annual percentage rate disclosed in 8conformity with any regulation, order, or written interpretive 9opinion of the Secretary or any such opinion of the Attorney 10General, whether or not such regulation, order, or written 11interpretive opinion is later amended, rescinded, or repealed 12or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for 13any reason. 14    Section 155. Beginning of registration. No person shall be 15required to register under this Act before the date 16established by the Department by rule. The date shall not be 17before January 1, 2026. 18    Section 160. Beginning of disclosure requirements. No 19person shall be required to comply with the disclosure 20requirements set forth in Sections 45, 50, 55, 60, 65, 70, and 21165 before the date established by the Department by rule. The 22date shall not be before January 1, 2026.   SB0260- 50 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    Section 165. Commercial financing database. 2    (a) A commercial financing database program is established 3within the Department. The program shall be administered in 4accordance with this Section. None of the duties, obligations, 5contingencies, or consequences of or from the program shall be 6imposed until 6 months after the Department certifies a 7commercial financing database under subsection (b). The 8program shall apply to all sales-based financings and 9commercial closed-end financings for which interest charges 10that accrue on the outstanding balance represent a minority of 11the finance charge that are governed by this Act and that are 12made or taken on or after the inception of the program.13    (b) The Department shall certify that a commercial 14financing database is a commercially reasonable method of 15reporting. Upon certifying that a commercial financing 16database is a commercially reasonable method of reporting, the 17Department shall: 18        (1) provide reasonable notice to all registrants 19    identifying the commercially reasonable method of 20    reporting that is available; and 21        (2) no earlier than 6 months after certification, 22    require each registrant offering sales-based financing or 23    commercial closed-end financings for which interest 24    charges that accrue on the outstanding balance represent a 25    minority of the finance charge to use a commercially 26    reasonable method of reporting as a means of complying   SB0260- 51 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    with subsection (d) of this Section.2    (c) The database created under this program shall be 3maintained and administered by the Department. The database 4shall be designed to allow providers to submit information to 5the database online. The database shall not be designed to 6allow providers to retrieve information from the database, 7except as otherwise provided in this Act. 8    (d) Within 30 days after providing funds to a recipient, 9the provider shall submit to the commercial financing database 10the information delineated in subsections (e) and (f). If at 11the time funds are provided to a recipient, certain 12information delineated in this subsection is not known, then 13the provider shall submit the information to the commercial 14financing database within 30 days after the information 15becoming ascertainable.16    (e) For sales-based financings, the provider shall submit 17the following information to the commercial financing 18database:19        (1) the FEIN for the recipient; 20        (2) the zip code of the recipient; 21        (3) the date on which the disclosure required under 22    Section 45 was provided;23        (4) the origination date of the sales-based financing;24        (5) the total amount of commercial financing;25        (6) the disbursed amount after any amount deducted or 26    withheld at disbursement, if different than the financing   SB0260- 52 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    amount;2        (7) the finance charge;3        (8) the estimated annual percentage rate as disclosed 4    to the recipient under paragraph (3) of Section 45;5        (9) the total repayment amount;6        (10) the estimated term, as disclosed to the recipient 7    under paragraph (5) of Section 45;8        (11) the percentage of the recipient's sales upon 9    which the payment is calculated;10        (12) the frequency of payment, and the total amount of 11    average projected payments per month, as disclosed to the 12    recipient under paragraph (6) of Section 45;13        (13) whether the projected sales volume used to 14    determine the estimated annual percentage rate, estimated 15    term, and projected payments provided in the disclosure 16    under Section 45 were determined according to the 17    historical method described in subparagraph (A) of 18    paragraph (3) of Section 45 or according to the 19    underwriting method described in subparagraph (B) of 20    paragraph (3) of Section 45;21        (14) the amount of any finance charge the recipient 22    would be required to pay if the recipient elects to pay off 23    or refinance the sales-based financing before full 24    repayment, as disclosed to the recipient;25        (15) description of collateral, if any, securing the 26    sales-based financing, including any guarantee;  SB0260- 53 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1        (16) the position of any lien taken;2        (17) upon full repayment, if the sales-based financing 3    includes a true-up mechanism, the number of true-ups 4    provided;5        (18) upon full repayment, the actual term of the 6    commercial financing;7        (19) upon full repayment, the actual annual percentage 8    rate calculated retrospectively based on the actual 9    payments collected; and10        (20) all other information requested by the 11    Department.12    (f) For closed-end financing for which interest charges 13that accrue on the outstanding balance represent a minority of 14the finance charge submit, the following information to the 15commercial financing database:16        (1) the FEIN for the recipient;17        (2) the zip code of the recipient;18        (3) the date on which the disclosure required under 19    Section 50 was provided;20        (4) the origination date;21        (5) the total amount of commercial financing;22        (6) the disbursed amount after any amount deducted or 23    withheld at disbursement, if different than the financing 24    amount;25        (7) the finance charge;26        (8) the annual percentage rate as disclosed to the   SB0260- 54 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    recipient under paragraph (3) of Section 50;2        (9) the total repayment amount;3        (10) the term of the financing;4        (11) the frequency of payment;5        (12) the amount of the payment, and the total amount 6    of average projected payments per month, as disclosed to 7    the recipient under paragraph (6) of Section 50;8        (13) the amount of any finance charge the recipient 9    would be required to pay if the recipient elects to pay off 10    or refinance the commercial financing before full 11    repayment, other than interest accrued since the last 12    payment, as disclosed to the recipient;13        (14) whether the recipient would be required to pay 14    any additional fees not already included in the finance 15    charge if the recipient elects to pay off or refinance the 16    commercial financing before full repayment, as disclosed 17    to the recipient;18        (15) description of collateral, if any, securing the 19    commercial financing, including any guarantee;20        (16) the position of any lien taken; and21        (17) all other information requested by the 22    Department.23    (g) All personally identifiable information and 24information identifying the identity of a recipient obtained 25by way of the commercial financing database is strictly 26confidential and shall be exempt from disclosure under the   SB0260- 55 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1Freedom of Information Act and any other law or regulation 2pertaining to the disclosure of information or documents. The 3Department may, by rule, identify any additional categories of 4information the disclosure of which would be contrary to the 5public interest. Any request for production of information 6from the commercial financing database, whether by subpoena, 7notice, or any other source, shall be referred to the 8Department. Any recipient may authorize in writing the release 9of database information. The Department may use the 10information in the database without the consent of the 11recipient or the registrant:12        (1) for the purposes of administering and enforcing 13    the program;14        (2) to prepare industry-level reports;15        (3) to provide information to the appropriate law 16    enforcement agency or the applicable administrative or 17    regulatory agency with a legitimate interest in the 18    information as determined by the Secretary;19        (4) as required to comply with applicable law; or20        (5) in any other manner that the Secretary deems is 21    not contrary to the public interest. 22    (h) A registrant who submits information to a certified 23database provider in accordance with this Section shall not be 24liable to any person for any subsequent release or disclosure 25of that information by the certified database provider, the 26Department, or any other person acquiring possession of the   SB0260- 56 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1information, regardless of whether the subsequent release or 2disclosure was lawful, authorized, or intentional. 3    (i) In certifying a commercially reasonable method of 4reporting, the Department shall ensure that the commercial 5financing database:6        (1) provides real-time access through an Internet 7    connection;8        (2) is accessible to the Department and to registrants 9    in order to ensure compliance with this Act and in order to 10    provide any other information that the Department deems 11    necessary; 12        (3) requires registrants to input whatever information 13    is required by the Department; 14        (4) maintains a real-time copy of the required 15    reporting information that is available to the Department 16    at all times and is the property of the Department; and 17        (5) contains safeguards to ensure that all information 18    contained in the database regarding consumers and 19    financing recipients is kept strictly confidential.20    (j) The certified commercial financing database may charge 21a fee to a registrant not to exceed $1 for each financing 22entered into the database. The certified commercial financing 23database shall not charge any additional fees or charges. 24    (k) The certified commercial financing database provider 25shall produce an annual report for the Department using the 26data submitted by registrants to the database. The Department   SB0260- 57 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1may publish this report to the public. 2    Section 170. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 3severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 4    Section 900. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 7.5 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)7    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 8by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 9exempt from inspection and copying:10        (a) All information determined to be confidential 11    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 12    Development Act.13        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 14    library users with specific materials under the Library 15    Records Confidentiality Act.16        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 17    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 18    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 19    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 20    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 21    has received.22        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 23    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating   SB0260- 58 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 2    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 3    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 4    Infection Control Act.5        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 6    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.7        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 8    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 9    Qualifications Based Selection Act.10        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 11    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 12    Tuition Act.13        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 14    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 15    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 16    general's office that would be exempt if created or 17    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 18    that Act.19        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 20    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 21    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 22    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.23        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 24    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 25    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.26        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information   SB0260- 59 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    or driver identification information compiled by a law 2    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 3    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.4        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 5    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 6    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 7    Prevention Review Team Act.8        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 9    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 10    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 11    authorized under that Article.12        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 13    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 14    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 15    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 16    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 17    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 18    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.19        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 20    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 21    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.22        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 23    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 24    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 25    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 26    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the   SB0260- 60 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 2    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 3    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 4    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 5    Act (repealed). 6        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 7    Personnel Record Review Act. 8        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 9    Illinois School Student Records Act. 10        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 11    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 12        (t) (Blank). 13        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 14    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 15    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 16        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 17    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 18    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 19    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 20    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 21    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 22    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 23    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 24    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 25    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 26        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification   SB0260- 61 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 2    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.3        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 4    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 5    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.6        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 7    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 8    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 9        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 10    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 11    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 12    information about the identity and administrative finding 13    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 14    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 15    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 16    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 17        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 18    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 19    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 20    Act. 21        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 22    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 23        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 24    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 25        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 26    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent   SB0260- 62 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    authorized under that Act.2        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 3    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 4    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 5        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 6    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 7        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 8    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 9        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 10    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 11    Code. 12        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 13    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 14        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 15    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 16    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 17        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 18    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 19    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 20    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 21    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 22        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 23    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 24        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 25    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 26    Aid Code.   SB0260- 63 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 2    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 3        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 4    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 5        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 6    arising out of a peer support counseling session 7    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 8    Suicide Prevention Act. 9        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 10    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 11    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 12    Prevention Act. 13        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 14    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 15    under the Reproductive Health Act. 16        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 17    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 18        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 19    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 20    Human Rights Act.21        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 22    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 23    Act. 24        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 25    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 26        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under   SB0260- 64 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 2    Public Aid Code. 3        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 4    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 5        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 6    information that shall not be made public under the 7    Illinois Insurance Code. 8        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 9    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.10        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 11    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 12        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 13    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 14        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 15    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 16    Police Act. 17        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 18    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 19    Administrative Code of Illinois. 20        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 21    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 22    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 23    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 24        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 25    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 26    Violence Fatality Review Act.   SB0260- 65 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 2    Act. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 3    July 1, 2025. 4        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 5    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 6    Agency Licensing Act. 7        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 8    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 9    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 10    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 11    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 12    Act. 13        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 14    the School Safety Drill Act. 15        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 16    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 17        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 18    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 19    Act. 20        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 21    2-3.196 of the School Code. 22        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 23    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 24    Power Agency Act. 25        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 26    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the   SB0260- 66 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 2        (ooo) (nnn) Data or information provided pursuant to 3    Section 20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment 4    Act. 5        (ppp) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 6    under Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity 7    Act. 8        (qqq) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 9    under Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 10        (rrr) (mmm) Information prohibited from being 11    disclosed under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money 12    Transmission Modernization Act. 13        (sss) (nnn) Information exempt from disclosure under 14    Section 40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.15        (ttt) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 16    165 of the Small Business Financing Transparency Act. 17(Source: P.A. 102-36, eff. 6-25-21; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 18102-292, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 102-559, eff. 198-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-946, eff. 7-1-22; 20102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-8, eff. 216-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 23103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 247-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, 25eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 8-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 26103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.)   SB0260- 67 -LRB104 06474 BAB 16510 b1    Section 905. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 2Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2HHHH as follows: 3    (815 ILCS 505/2HHHH new)4    Sec. 2HHHH. Violations of the Small Business Financing 5Transparency Act. Any person who violates the Small Business 6Financing Transparency Act commits an unlawful practice within 7the meaning of this Act. 8    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.